Missouri, session 2026, HB3441.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.515, to read as follows:
9.515. August twelfth each year is hereby designated as "Election Worker
2 Appreciation Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate
3 in appropriate events and activities to celebrate the essential contributions of election
4 workers and express appreciation for the vital role they play in elections.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.